Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.070

Personnel.

The director shall have the power to employ such personnel as may be necessary for the general administration of the office: PROVIDED, That, except as elsewhere specified in this chapter, such employment is in accordance with the rules of the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 239 s 5.]